Washington statutes.
RCW 41.76.060

Rule making.

The commission is authorized from time to time to make, amend, and rescind, in the manner prescribed by the administrative procedure act, chapter 34.05 RCW, such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

[ 2002 c 356 s 15.]